fi: Toimitettavaan settiin sisältyvät lelut: Esiliina; Kassakone; Siivousvälineet; Ruoanlaittovälineet; Rooliasu; Luottokortti/pankkikortti; Hattu/kypärä; Kannettava / tietokone; Nimilappu/henkilökortti; Puhelin; Leikkiraha/kolikot; Kaukosäädin; Ostoskori/-kärry; Stetoskooppi/lääkärintarvikkeet; Tabletti; Astiat; Työkaluvyö; Työkalut; Leikkiruoka; Muu
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu do zabawy w udawanie: Fartuch; Kasa; Narzędzia do sprzątania; Naczynia kuchenne; Kostium/strój do odgrywania ról; Karta kredytowa/karta do bankomatu; Czapka/kask; Laptop/komputer; Identyfikator; Telefon; Pieniądze do zabawy/monety; Pilot; Koszyk/wózek na zakupy; Stetoskop/narzędzia medyczne; Tablet; Zastawa stołowa; Pas na narzędzia; Narzędzia; Zabawkowe jedzenie; Inne
cs: Součástí sady pro hraní na role jsou dílky: Zástěra; Pokladna; Úklidové pomůcky; Nádobí na vaření; Kostým / oblečení na hraní rolí; Kreditní karta / platební karta; Klobouk/helma; Notebook/počítač; Jmenovka / identifikační karta; Telefon; Hrací peníze / mince; Dálkové ovládání; Nákupní košík / vozík; Stetoskop / lékařské nástroje; Tablet; Stolní nádobí; Opasek na nářadí; Nářadí; Hrací jídlo; Ostatní
nb: Sett med rollelekedeler inkludert: Forkle; Kassaapparat; Rengjøringsverktøy; Kokekar; Kostyme/rollelek-antrekk; Kredittkort/bankkort; Hatt/hjelm; Bærbar datamaskin / datamaskin; Navneskilt/ID-kort; Telefon; Lekepenger/mynter; Fjernkontroll; Handlekurv/-vogn; Stetoskop / medisinske verktøy; Nettbrett; Servise; Verktøybelte; Verktøy; Lekemat; Annet
ru: Элементы игрового набора: Фартук; Кассовый аппарат; Инструменты для уборки; Посуда для готовки; Костюм / наряд для ролевых игр; Кредитная / банковская карта; Шляпа / шлем; Ноутбук / компьютер; Бейдж / удостоверение; Телефон; Игровые деньги / монеты; Пульт ДУ; Корзина / тележка для покупок; Стетоскоп / медицинские инструменты; Планшет; Столовая посуда; Пояс для инструментов; Инструменты; Игрушечная еда; Другое
ro-RO: Piese de joc de rol incluse: Șorț; Casierie; Unelte de curățenie; Vase de gătit; Costum/ținută pentru jocuri de rol; Card de credit/card bancar; Pălărie/cască; Laptop/computer; Ecuson/carte de identitate; Telefon; Bani/monede de jucărie; Telecomandă; Coș/cărucior de cumpărături; Stetoscop/instrumente medicale; Tabletă; Veselă; Centură de scule; Scule; Mâncare de jucărie; Altele
it: Elementi del set per il gioco di finzione inclusi: Grembiule; Registratore di cassa; Attrezzi per le pulizie; Pentolame; Costume/vestito per giochi di ruolo; Carta di credito/bancomat; Cappello/elmetto; Laptop/computer; Cartellino con nome/tesserino di riconoscimento; Telefono; Soldi/monete finti; Telecomando; Cestino/carrello della spesa; Stetoscopio/strumenti medici; Tablet; Stoviglie; Cintura porta attrezzi; Attrezzi; Cibo giocattolo; Altro
es: Piezas del juego incluidas: Delantal; Caja registradora; Herramientas de limpieza; Batería de cocina; Disfraz/traje de juego de rol; Tarjeta de crédito/cajero automático; Sombrero/casco; Laptop/computadora; Placa de identificación/credencial; Teléfono; Dinero/monedas de juguete; Control remoto; Cesta/carrito de compras; Estetoscopio/instrumentos médicos; Tableta; Vajilla; Cinturón de herramientas; Herramientas; Comida de juguete; Otro
en: Pretend play set pieces included: Apron; Cash register; Cleaning tools; Cookware; Costume/role-play outfit; Credit card/ATM card; Hat/helmet; Laptop/computer; Name badge/ID card; Phone; Play money/coins; Remote control; Shopping basket/cart; Stethoscope/medical tools; Tablet; Tableware; Tool belt; Tools; Toy food; Other
vi: Bao gồm các mảnh ghép của bộ đồ chơi đóng vai: Tạp dề; Máy tính tiền; Dụng cụ vệ sinh; Dụng cụ nấu ăn; Trang phục/đồ hóa trang; Thẻ tín dụng/Thẻ ATM; Mũ/mũ bảo hiểm; Laptop/máy tính; Thẻ tên/thẻ ID; Điện thoại; Tiền giấy/tiền xu đồ chơi; Điều khiển từ xa; Giỏ/xe đẩy mua sắm; Ống nghe/dụng cụ y tế; Máy tính bảng; Bộ đồ ăn; Đai dụng cụ; Dụng cụ; Thức ăn đồ chơi; Khác
el: Εξαρτήματα που περιλαμβάνονται στο σετ παιχνιδιού ρόλων.: Ποδιά; Ταμειακή μηχανή; Εργαλεία καθαρισμού; Σκεύη μαγειρικής; Στολή/ρούχα παιχνιδιού ρόλων; Πιστωτική κάρτα/κάρτα ATM; Καπέλο/κράνος; Laptop/υπολογιστής; Ταμπελάκι ονόματος/ταυτότητα; Τηλέφωνο; Ψεύτικα χαρτονομίσματα/νομίσματα; Τηλεχειριστήριο; Καλάθι/καροτσάκι αγορών; Στηθοσκόπιο/ιατρικά εργαλεία; Tablet; Επιτραπέζια σκεύη; Ζώνη εργαλείων; Εργαλεία; Παιδικά τρόφιμα; Άλλο
ja: ごっこ遊びセットのパーツが含まれています: エプロン; キャッシュレジスター; 掃除道具; 調理器具; コスチューム/ロールプレイの衣装; クレジットカード/ATMカード; 帽子/ヘルメット; ノートパソコン/コンピューター; 名札/IDカード; 電話; おもちゃのお金/硬貨; リモコン; 買い物かご/カート; 聴診器/医療器具; タブレット; 食器; ツールベルト; ツール; おもちゃの食べ物; その他
sk-SK: Kusy súpravy rolovej hry: Zástera; Pokladňa; Nástroje na upratovanie; Kuchynský riad; Kostým/oblečenie na hranie rolí; Kreditná karta/platobná karta; Čiapka/prilba; Notebook/počítač; Menovka/ID preukaz; Telefón; Herné peniaze/mince; Diaľkové ovládanie; Nákupný košík/vozík; Stetoskop/lekárske nástroje; Tablet; Stolový riad; Opasok na náradie; Náradie; Hračkárske jedlo; Iné
zh-TW: 角色扮演套組內含部件: 圍裙; 收銀機; 清潔工具; 鍋具; 戲服/角色扮演服裝; 信用卡/提款卡; 帽子/頭盔; 筆記型電腦/電腦; 識別證/身分證; 手機; 玩具紙鈔/硬幣; 遙控器; 購物籃/推車; 聽診器/醫療工具; 平板電腦; 餐具; 工具腰帶; 工具; 玩具食物; 其他
ko: 역할놀이 세트 구성품 포함: 앞치마; 금전 등록기; 청소 도구; 조리 기구; 코스튬/역할놀이 의상; 신용 카드/ATM 카드; 모자/헬멧; 노트북/컴퓨터; 이름표/신분증; 전화기; 장난감 돈/동전; 리모컨; 쇼핑 바구니/카트; 청진기/의료 도구; 태블릿; 식기; 공구 벨트; 공구; 장난감 음식; 기타
tr: Dahil olan oyuncak set parçaları: Önlük; Yazar kasa; Temizlik aletleri; Pişirme gereçleri; Kostüm/rol yapma kıyafeti; Kredi kartı/ATM kartı; Şapka/kask; Dizüstü bilgisayar/bilgisayar; Yaka kartı/kimlik kartı; Telefon; Oyun parası/madeni para; Uzaktan kumanda; Alışveriş sepeti/arabası; Stetoskop/tıbbi aletler; Tablet; Sofra takımı; Alet kemeri; Aletler; Oyuncak yiyecek; Diğer
bg-BG: Включени части в комплекта за ролева игра: Престилка; Касов апарат; Инструменти за почистване; Съдове за готвене; Костюм/облекло за ролеви игри; Кредитна/дебитна карта; Шапка/каска; Лаптоп/компютър; Бадж с име/идентификационна карта; Телефон; Игрови пари/монети; Дистанционно управление; Кошница/количка за пазаруване; Стетоскоп/медицински инструменти; Таблет; Съдове за хранене; Колан за инструменти; Инструменти; Играчка храна; Друго
nl: Fantasiespelset onderdelen inbegrepen: Schort; Kassa; Schoonmaakgereedschap; Kookgerei; Kostuum/rollenspeloutfit; Creditcard/bankpas; Hoed/helm; Laptop/computer; Naambadge/ID-kaart; Telefoon; Speelgeld/munten; Afstandsbediening; Winkelmandje/-wagentje; Stethoscoop/medische instrumenten; Tablet; Servies; Gereedschapsriem; Gereedschap; Speelgoedeten; Anders
lt-LT: Įtrauktos vaidmenų žaidimo rinkinio dalys: Prijuostė; Kasos aparatas; Valymo įrankiai; Indai maisto gaminimui; Kostiumas / vaidmenų žaidimo apranga; Kredito / bankomato kortelė; Kepurė / šalmas; Nešiojamasis kompiuteris / kompiuteris; Vardo kortelė / ID kortelė; Telefonas; Žaisliniai pinigai / monetos; Nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Pirkinių krepšys / vežimėlis; Stetoskopas / medicinos įrankiai; Planšetinis kompiuteris; Stalo indai; Įrankių diržas; Įrankiai; Žaislinis maistas; Kita
da: Medfølgende dele i legesæt: Forklæde; Kasseapparat; Rengøringsudstyr; Kogegrej; Kostume/rollespilstøj; Kreditkort/hævekort; Hat/hjelm; Bærbar pc/computer; Navneskilt/ID-kort; Telefon; Legepenge/-mønter; Fjernbetjening; Indkøbskurv/-vogn; Stetoskop/lægeudstyr; Tablet; Service; Værktøjsbælte; Værktøj; Legetøjsmad; Andet
sv: Delar som ingår i låtsaslekset: Förkläde; Kassaapparat; Städredskap; Kokkärl; Maskeraddräkt/rollspelskläder; Kreditkort/bankkort; Hatt/hjälm; Bärbar dator/dator; Namnskylt/ID-kort; Telefon; Låtsaspengar/mynt; Fjärrkontroll; Varukorg/kundvagn; Stetoskop/medicinska verktyg; Surfplatta; Bordsservis; Verktygsbälte; Verktyg; Leksaksmat; Övrigt
th: ชุดของเล่นสมมุติประกอบด้วยชิ้นส่วนต่างๆ: ผ้ากันเปื้อน; เครื่องบันทึกเงินสด; เครื่องมือทำความสะอาด; เครื่องครัว; คอสตูม/ชุดบทบาทสมมติ; บัตรเครดิต/บัตร ATM; หมวก/หมวกกันน็อก; แล็ปท็อป/คอมพิวเตอร์; ป้ายชื่อ/บัตรประจำตัว; โทรศัพท์; ธนบัตรจำลอง/เหรียญจำลอง; รีโมทคอนโทรล; ตะกร้าช้อปปิ้ง/รถเข็น; หูฟังแพทย์/เครื่องมือแพทย์; แท็บเล็ต; ภาชนะบนโต๊ะอาหาร; เข็มขัดช่าง; เครื่องมือ; อาหารของเล่น; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Conjunto de faz de conta peças incluídas: Avental; Caixa registradora; Ferramentas de limpeza; Utensílios de cozinha; Fantasia/roupa para encenação; Cartão de crédito/débito; Chapéu/capacete; Notebook/computador; Crachá/carteira de identidade; Telefone; Dinheiro/moedas de brinquedo; Controle remoto; Cesta/carrinho de compras; Estetoscópio/ferramentas médicas; Tablet; Aparelho de jantar; Cinto de utilidades; Ferramentas; Comida de brinquedo; Outros
zh-CN: 过家家玩具套装包含配件: 围裙; 收银机; 清洁工具; 炊具; 服装/角色扮演服; 信用卡/ATM 卡; 帽子/头盔; 笔记本电脑/电脑; 胸卡/身份证; 电话; 玩具纸币/硬币; 遥控器; 购物篮/购物车; 听诊器/医疗工具; 平板电脑; 餐具; 工具带; 工具; 玩具食物; 其他
pt-PT: Peças incluídas no conjunto do brinquedo de faz-de-conta: Avental; Caixa registadora; Ferramentas de limpeza; Utensílios de cozinha; Disfarce/fato de encenação; Cartão de crédito/multibanco; Chapéu/capacete; Portátil/computador; Crachá/cartão de identificação; Telemóvel; Dinheiro/moedas de brincar; Comando; Cesto/carrinho de compras; Estetoscópio/instrumentos médicos; Tablet; Louça de mesa; Cinto de ferramentas; Ferramentas; Comida de brincar; Outra
hu: Szerepjáték-készlet mellékelt darabjai: Kötény; Pénztárgép; Takarítóeszközök; Edények; Jelmez / szerepjátszó ruha; Hitelkártya / bankkártya; Kalap / sisak; Laptop / számítógép; Névkitűző / azonosító kártya; Telefon; Játékpénz / érmék; Távirányító; Bevásárlókosár / bevásárlókocsi; Sztetoszkóp / orvosi eszközök; Táblagép; Étkészlet; Szerszámosöv; Szerszámok; Játékétel; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi kompleta za navidezno igro: Predpasnik; Blagajna; Pripomočki za čiščenje; Posoda; Kostum/obleka za igranje vlog; Kreditna/bančna kartica; Klobuk/čelada; Prenosnik/računalnik; Priponka z imenom/osebna izkaznica; Telefon; Igralni denar/kovanci; Daljinski upravljalnik; Nakupovalna košara/voziček; Stetoskop/medicinski pripomočki; Tablica; Namizna posoda; Pas za orodje; Orodje; Igrača hrana; Drugo
hr-HR: Uključeni dijelovi za igranje pretvaranja: Pregača; Blagajna; Alati za čišćenje; Posuđe za kuhanje; Kostim/odjeća za igru uloga; Kreditna/bankovna kartica; Šešir/kaciga; Prijenosno računalo / računalo; Pločica s imenom / ID kartica; Telefon; Novac/kovanice za igru; Daljinski upravljač; Košara/kolica za kupovinu; Stetoskop/medicinski alati; Tablet; Pribor za jelo; Pojas za alat; Alati; Igračke hrane; Ostalo
de: Enthaltene Teile des Rollenspielsets: Schürze; Kasse; Reinigungszubehör; Kochgeschirr; Kostüm / Rollenspiel-Outfit; Kreditkarte / Bankkarte; Hut / Helm; Laptop / Computer; Namensschild / Ausweis; Telefon; Spielgeld / Münzen; Fernbedienung; Einkaufskorb / -wagen; Stethoskop / medizinisches Zubehör; Tablet; Geschirr; Werkzeuggürtel; Werkzeuge; Spielzeug-Lebensmittel; Sonstige
fr: Éléments inclus dans le jeu d’imitation: Tablier; Caisse enregistreuse; Outils de nettoyage; Batterie de cuisine; Costume/déguisement; Carte de crédit/carte bancaire; Chapeau/casque; Ordinateur portable/ordinateur; Badge nominatif/carte d’identité; Téléphone; Fausse monnaie/pièces de monnaie; Télécommande; Panier/chariot de courses; Stéthoscope/outils médicaux; Tablette; Vaisselle; Ceinture à outils; Outils; Nourriture jouet; Autre